Utah statutes.
57-1-32.   Sale of trust property by trustee -- Action to recover balance
due upon obligation for which trust deed was given as security -- Collection
of costs and attorney's fees.
At any time within three months after any sale of property under a trust deed
as provided in Sections 57-1-23, 57-1-24, and 57-1-27, an action may be
commenced to recover the balance due upon the obligation for which the trust
deed was given as security, and in that action the complaint shall set forth
the entire amount of the indebtedness that was secured by the trust deed, the
amount for which the property was sold, and the fair market value of the
property at the date of sale.  Before rendering judgment, the court shall find
the fair market value of the property at the date of sale.  The court may not
render judgment for more than the amount by which the amount of the
indebtedness with interest, costs, and expenses of sale, including trustee's
and attorney's fees, exceeds the fair market value of the property as of the
date of the sale.  In any action brought under this section, the prevailing
party shall be entitled to collect its costs and reasonable attorney fees
incurred.
